apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="addu/ir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iríem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iria</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iríeu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iries</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>irien</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iria</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>irem</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iré</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ireu</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iràs</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iran</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>irà</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>íssim</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ís</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>íssiu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ïssis</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ïssin</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ís</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>írem</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>íreu</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïres</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïren</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïm</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïm</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïguem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïu</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eix</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïx</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eix</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ïx</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïsquen</l>   <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquen</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esquin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïsquen</l>   <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixi</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esqui</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïsca</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixi</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esca</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>esqui</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïsca</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íem</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïa</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>íeu</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïes</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïen</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïa</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>íssim</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïrem</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ís</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïra</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>íssiu</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïreu</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ïssis</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïres</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ïssin</l>    <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïren</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ís</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ïra</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïdes</l>      <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïda</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïts</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ït</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ïm</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>eixo</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="agrair">          <i>agra</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atribuir">        <i>atribu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beneir">          <i>bene</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conduir">         <i>condu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confluir">        <i>conflu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="constituir">      <i>constitu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="construir">       <i>constru</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contribuir">      <i>contribu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deduir">          <i>dedu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="derruir">         <i>derru</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="destituir">       <i>destitu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="destruir">        <i>destru</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diluir">          <i>dilu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disminuir">       <i>disminu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distribuir">      <i>distribu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="envair">          <i>enva</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esvair">          <i>esva</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fluir">           <i>flu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="immiscuir">       <i>immiscu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="induir">          <i>indu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="influir">         <i>influ</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="instruir">        <i>instru</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="introduir">       <i>introdu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intuir">          <i>intu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maleir">          <i>male</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obeir">           <i>obe</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="posseir">         <i>posse</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="produir">         <i>produ</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="proveir">         <i>prove</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reconduir">       <i>recondu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reconstruir">     <i>reconstru</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reduir">          <i>redu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="relluir">         <i>rellu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reproduir">       <i>reprodu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="seduir">          <i>sedu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="substituir">      <i>substitu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="succeir">         <i>succe</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traduir">         <i>tradu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trair">           <i>tra</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="instituir" a="prompsit2adn"><i>institu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obstruir" a="prompsit2adn"><i>obstru</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="esbalair" a="prompsit2adn"><i>esbala</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prostituir" a="prompsit2adn"><i>prostitu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redistribuir" a="prompsit2adn"><i>redistribu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restituir" a="prompsit2adn"><i>restitu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retribuir" a="prompsit2adn"><i>retribu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desobeir" a="prompsit"><i>desobe</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desposseir" a="prompsit"><i>desposse</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desproveir" a="prompsit"><i>desprove</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esgrogueir" a="prompsit"><i>esgrogue</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atapeir" a="prompsit"><i>atape</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afluir">          <i>aflu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="circuir">         <i>circu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desagrair">       <i>desagra</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esmorteir">       <i>esmorte</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="imbuir">          <i>imbu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retraduir">       <i>retradu</i><par n="addu/ir__vblex"/></e>
